Illinois, session 104th, HB2965.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Criminal Code of 2012 is amended by 5changing Section 24-4.1 as follows: 6    (720 ILCS 5/24-4.1)7    Sec. 24-4.1. Report of lost or stolen firearms. 8    (a) If a person who possesses a valid Firearm Owner's 9Identification Card and who possesses or acquires a firearm 10thereafter loses the firearm, or if the firearm is stolen from 11the person, the person must report the loss or theft to the 12local law enforcement agency within 72 hours after obtaining 13knowledge of the loss or theft.14    (b) A law enforcement agency having jurisdiction shall 15take a written report and shall, as soon as practical, enter 16the firearm's serial number as stolen into the Law Enforcement 17Agencies Data System (LEADS).18    (c) A person shall not be in violation of this Section if:19        (1) the failure to report is due to an act of God, act 20    of war, or inability of a law enforcement agency to 21    receive the report;22        (2) the person is hospitalized, in a coma, or is 23    otherwise seriously physically or mentally impaired as to   HB2965- 2 -LRB104 12112 JDS 22211 b1    prevent the person from reporting; or2        (3) the person's designee makes a report if the person 3    is unable to make the report. 4    (c-1) If a firearm that has been lost or stolen is taken 5into possession by a law enforcement officer, whether or not 6the firearm has been reported by its previous possessor as 7lost or stolen to the local law enforcement agency within the 8time period required by subsection (a), the law enforcement 9agency, upon the identification of the previous possessor of 10the firearm, shall issue a citation for which a penalty shall 11be set at $500 for a first offense and $1,000 for a second 12offense. If the offender fails to pay the fine, the offender 13forfeits the lost or stolen firearm and the offender's Firearm 14Owner's Identification Card and concealed carry license, if 15any have been issued to the offender, are revoked. After 3 lost 16or stolen firearms, the court shall revoke the person's 17Firearm Owner's Identification Card and concealed carry 18license if issued to the person. Any person whose Firearm 19Owner's Identification Card or concealed carry license is 20revoked as a result of this subsection (c-1) shall surrender 21all the person's firearms, Firearm Owner's Identification 22Card, and concealed carry license to the local law enforcement 23agency. Mitigating circumstances, including, but not limited 24to, a timely filed report of a lost or stolen firearm, may be 25considered in reducing the penalty. 26    (d) Sentence. A person who violates this Section is guilty   HB2965- 3 -LRB104 12112 JDS 22211 b1of a petty offense for a first violation. A second or 2subsequent violation of this Section is a Class A misdemeanor.3(Source: P.A. 98-508, eff. 8-19-13.)